Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3308
Immediate supervision, defined.

Immediate supervision means that the supervisor is on the premises and is in direct eyesight and hearing range of the animal and the veterinary technician or unlicensed assistant who is treating the animal and the animal has been examined by a veterinarian at such times as acceptable veterinary practice requires consistent with the particular delegated animal health care task.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1090.